Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 32. Centralized Licensing and Related Administrative Procedures.

Cross references. —

Under § 52,
ch. 57, SLA 2005, the changes involving licensing and related administrative procedures that are affected by the enactment of this chapter apply to (1) applications or requests submitted within the 90 days before, or submitted on or after, July 2, 2005, for initial licensure, certification, or other approval of an entity listed in
AS

47.32.010(b)

; and (2) applications submitted within the 90 days before, or submitted on or after, July 2, 2005, for renewal of a license issued before July 2, 2005, under a statute repealed or amended by
ch. 57, SLA 2005, regarding a type of entity listed in
AS

47.32.010(b)

.

For transitional provisions regarding applications for licenses or approvals under the chapter that were submitted more than 90 days before July 2, 2005, see § 56, ch. 57, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For transitional provisions concerning requirements, standards, monitoring, enforcement actions, and the validity of license issued before July 2, 2005, for a facility that is a type of entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

, see sec. 55, ch. 57, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 69, SLA 2018 (SB 81), which served as a basis for the 2018 changes to provisions of this chapter, see 2017 Senate Journal 452 — 454.

Sec. 47.32.010.
Purpose and applicability.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish centralized licensing and related administrative procedures for the delivery of services in this state by the entities listed in (b) of this section. These procedures are intended to promote safe and appropriate services by setting standards for licensure that will reduce predictable risk; improve quality of care; foster individual and patient rights; and otherwise advance public health, safety, and welfare.

This chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter apply to the following entities:

ambulatory surgical centers;

assisted living homes;

child care facilities;

child placement agencies;

foster homes;

freestanding birth centers;

home health agencies;

hospices, or agencies providing hospice services or operating hospice programs;

hospitals;

intermediate care facilities for individuals with an intellectual disability or related condition;

maternity homes;

nursing facilities;

residential child care facilities;

residential psychiatric treatment centers;

runaway shelters;

rural health clinics;

crisis stabilization centers.

The provisions of AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

, regarding criminal history, criminal history checks, criminal history use standards, and civil history databases, apply to entities listed in (b) of this section, as provided in AS

47.05.300

.

History.

(§§ 34, 35 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 26 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 18 ch 69 SLA 2018; am § 7 ch 28 SLA 2020)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, the entities listed in subsection (b) were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing the applicability of (c) of this section to certain applications or requests for initial licensure, certification, or other approval or selection, or for renewal of a license, certification, or other approval or selection, see § 53, ch. 57, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For specialized hospitals, see 7 AAC 12, art. 4.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For frontier extended stay clinics, see 7 AAC 12, art. 10.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For care and services, see 7 AAC 50, art. 5.

For environment, see 7 AAC 50, art. 6.

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For admission, see 7 AAC 57, art. 4.

For care and services, see 7 AAC 57, art. 5.

For environment, see 7 AAC 57, art. 6.

For specializations, see 7 AAC 57, art. 7.

For licensing of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 1.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

For variances, see 7 AAC 75, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective March 1, 2006, added subsection (c).

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (b)(10), substituted “individuals with an intellectual disability or related condition” for “the mentally retarded”.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in (c), substituted “civil history databases” for “a centralized registry” following “criminal history use standards, and”.

The 2020 amendment, effective July 28, 2020, in (b), added (17) and made a related change.

Sec. 47.32.020.
Requirement to obtain a license; exemption.

An entity may not operate a facility described in AS

47.32.010(b)

without first obtaining a license under this chapter unless the entity is exempt under regulations adopted under AS

47.32.030

or is exempt under (c) of this section.

If an entity encompasses more than one type of activity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

, the entity shall apply for and receive a separate license under this chapter before operating that type of activity unless exempt under regulations adopted under AS

47.32.030

.

If a nonprofit organization operates a program that assists parents to find temporary care for a child, the nonprofit organization is exempt from the licensing and other requirements of this chapter when operating the program.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 6, 7 ch 28 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Under § 55(a),
ch. 57, SLA 2005, notwithstanding
AS

47.32.020

, a facility that is a type of entity listed in
AS

47.32.010(b)

and that, on July 2, 2005, is being operated under a valid license or under an approval issued by the department under a statute repealed or amended by
ch. 57, SLA 2005, may continue to be operated under that license or approval as provided in § 55,
ch. 57, SLA 2005.
Under § 55(c),
ch. 57, SLA 2005, until renewal or expiration of a current license under § 55(d) or (e), the requirements and standards, including department oversight, monitoring, and enforcement actions, regarding operation of a facility that is authorized to continue operating are those that were in effect in statute or regulation on July 1, 2005.
Under § 55(d),
ch. 57, SLA 2005, unless the terms of the facility’s current license provide for an earlier expiration date, and unless an enforcement action taken by the department as provided in § 55(c) affects the validity of the current license, the expiration date of the current license of a facility described in § 55(a) is June 30, 2006.
Section 55(e) directs that application for license renewal must be made under
AS

47.32.060

, by the date required by that statute, for a facility described in § 55(a) for which renewal of licensure is desired before expiration of the facility’s current license and provides that, for purposes of renewal of a license under
AS

47.32.060

, the current license for the facility is considered to be a biennial license under this chapter.

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For specialized hospitals, see 7 AAC 12, art. 4.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For frontier extended stay clinics, see 7 AAC 12, art. 10.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (a), inserted “or is exempt under (c) of this section” following “AS

47.32.020

”; added (c).

Sec. 47.32.030.
Powers of the department; delegation to municipality.

The department may

administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter;

coordinate and develop policies, programs, and planning related to licensure and operation of entities listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

as defined by regulation;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including regulations that

establish fees for licensing of each type of entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

;

impose requirements for licensure, including standards for license renewal, that are in addition to the requirements of this chapter or of any other applicable state or federal statute or regulation;

impose requirements and standards on licensed entities that are in addition to those imposed by this chapter or by any other applicable state or federal statute or regulation, including

requirements and standards necessary for an entity or the state to receive money from the department from any source, including federal money;

record-keeping requirements;

reporting requirements; and

requirements and standards regarding health, safety, and sanitation;

provide for waivers, variances, and exemptions from the requirements of this chapter, including the requirement to obtain a license, if the department finds it necessary for the efficient administration of this chapter; and

establish requirements for the operation of entities licensed under this chapter;

investigate

entities described in AS 47.32.010(b);

applicants for licensure, including individuals named in an application; and

other persons that the department has reason to believe are operating an entity required to be licensed under this chapter, or are residing or working in an entity for which licensure has been sought under this chapter; this subparagraph does not apply to persons receiving services from an entity for which licensure has been sought under this chapter;

inspect and monitor licensed entities for compliance with this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter, and any other applicable statutes or regulations;

enter into contracts and agreements necessary to carry out the functions, powers, and duties of the department under this chapter;

enter into agreements with private entities, municipalities, and individuals to investigate and make recommendations to the department regarding the licensure and monitoring of entities under this chapter;

require an individual who is or will be operating an entity to complete training related to the operation of the entity;

waive the application requirements for an entity seeking licensure if the entity submits documentation verifying that it

has a license issued by an organization or other agency that has licensing authority under state or federal law if the standards for that licensure are approved by the department under this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter;

has accreditation from a nationally recognized organization if the standards for that accreditation are equal to or more stringent than the standards for licensure under this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter; or

is an entity that federal law does not require to be licensed.

The department shall delegate the department’s authority to regulate child care facilities to a municipality that has adopted an ordinance providing for child care licensing under home rule powers under AS

29.10.010

or as authorized under AS

29.35.200

—

29.35.210

. The department shall make the delegation described in this subsection within 90 days after receiving a written request from the municipality to delegate the authority. A municipality receiving a delegation under this subsection may adopt additional requirements for child care facilities operating within the boundaries of the municipality if the requirements meet or exceed the requirements under state law.

The issuance of a license by the department does not obligate the department to place or maintain an individual in an entity or through an entity, or to provide financial support to an entity.

The department may not require a licensed entity to increase services for the sole purpose of accommodating a physician’s practice of prescribing, dispensing, or administering an investigational drug, biological product, or device, or providing related treatment, to a patient. In this subsection, “investigational drug, biological product, or device” has the meaning given in AS

08.64.367

.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 53 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For specialized hospitals, see 7 AAC 12, art. 4.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For frontier extended stay clinics, see 7 AAC 12, art. 10.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For care and services, see 7 AAC 50, art. 5.

For environment, see 7 AAC 50, art. 6.

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For admission, see 7 AAC 57, art. 4.

For care and services, see 7 AAC 57, art. 5.

For environment, see 7 AAC 57, art. 6.

For specializations, see 7 AAC 57, art. 7.

For licensing of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 1.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

For variances, see 7 AAC 75, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, added (d).

Sec. 47.32.032.
Foster care license; variance.

The department shall streamline the application and licensing paperwork necessary for a person to be approved as a foster parent or relative placement to the extent consistent with federal law.

The department shall approve a variance of the applicable building code requirements for licensure of a foster care home to the extent permitted by federal law if an applicant does not meet the requirements at the time of inspection and

the home design and construction is consistent with homes located in the community; and

the home is otherwise a safe environment for a child.

To the extent feasible, the department shall approve or deny a foster care home license, including a request for a variance under this section, not more than 45 days after the date the department receives the application for a foster care home license. If it is not feasible to approve or deny a foster care home license not more than 45 days after receiving the application, a supervisory-level employee may authorize a longer period of time for the decision, but the period must be the shortest period feasible.

History.

(§ 8 ch 59 SLA 2012; am § 21 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of subsection (c), see sec. 22(b), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (c).

Effective dates. —

Section 8, ch. 59, SLA 2012 which enacted this section, took effect on September 9, 2012.

Sec. 47.32.040.
Application for license.

A person shall apply to the department for a license under this chapter. The application must be made to the department on a form provided by the department or in a format approved by the department, and must be accompanied by

any fee established by regulation; and

documents and information required by regulation.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For frontier extended stay clinics, see 7 AAC 12, art. 10.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.050.
Provisional license; biennial license.

The department may issue a provisional license to an entity for which application is made under AS

47.32.040

if, after inspection and investigation, the department determines that the application and the entity meet the requirements of this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter, and any other applicable statutes or regulations. A provisional license is valid for a period not to exceed one year, except that the department may extend a provisional license for one additional period not to exceed one year.

Before expiration of a provisional license issued under (a) of this section, the department shall inspect and investigate the entity to determine whether the entity is operating in compliance with this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter, and any other applicable statutes or regulations. After inspection and investigation under this subsection and before expiration of a provisional license, the department shall issue a biennial license for the entity if the department finds that

the entity meets the requirements for biennial licensure established in this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter, and other applicable statutes and regulations;

a ground for nonrenewal of a license does not exist; and

any applicable fee has been paid.

The department may place one or more conditions on a provisional or biennial license issued under this section in order to further the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For frontier extended stay clinics, see 7 AAC 12, art. 10.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.060.
License renewal.

At least 90 days before expiration of a biennial license, a licensed entity that intends to remain licensed shall submit an application for renewal of the license on a form provided by the department or in a format approved by the department, accompanied by

all documents and information identified in regulation as being required for renewal of the license; and

any fee established by regulation.

Before expiration of a biennial license, the department or its representative may inspect an entity that is the subject of a renewal application to determine whether the entity is operating in compliance with this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter, and other applicable statutes or regulations. After any inspection and investigation under this subsection and before expiration of the biennial license, the department shall renew a biennial license if the department finds that

the licensed entity meets the requirements for renewal;

a ground for nonrenewal of a license does not exist; and

any applicable fee has been paid.

If an application for renewal of a license is submitted but the department is unable to complete its review of the application before the expiration of the biennial license, the license is automatically extended for six months or until the department completes its review and either approves or denies the application, whichever occurs earlier.

The department may place one or more conditions on a renewed license issued under this section to further the purposes of this section.

The department shall adopt regulations establishing the grounds for nonrenewal of a license for purposes of AS

47.32.050

and this section.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.070.
Notice of denial or conditions; appeal.

If the department denies an application for or places conditions on a provisional or biennial license or license renewal, the department shall provide the applicant or entity with a notice of the action by certified mail. The notice must contain a written statement of the reason for the action and information about requesting a hearing under (b) of this section.

An applicant or entity that receives a notice of action under (a) of this section may appeal the department’s decision by requesting a hearing within 15 days after receipt of the notice. The appeal must be on a form provided by the department or in a format approved by the department.

In considering whether to deny an application for or place a condition on a license, the department shall consider the licensing history of the applicant, including any enforcement action under this chapter.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 19 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (c).

Sec. 47.32.080.
Posting; license not transferable.

A license issued under this chapter shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises. Any notice of a variance issued by the department shall be posted near the license.

A license issued under this chapter is not transferable unless authorized by the department.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.090.
Complaints; investigation; retaliation.

A person who believes that an entity has violated an applicable statute or regulation or a condition of a license issued under this chapter may file a verbal or written complaint with the department.

The department may investigate a complaint filed under this section. The department may decline to investigate a complaint if the department reasonably concludes and documents that the complaint is without merit based on information available to the department at the time of the complaint. The department may consolidate complaints if the department concludes that a single investigation would further the efficient administration of this chapter.

A licensed entity may not take retaliatory action against a person who files a complaint. Except as provided in AS

47.05.350

and AS

47.32.160

, a complainant against whom a retaliatory action has been taken may recover treble damages in a civil action upon a showing that the action was taken in retaliation for the filing of a complaint.

The department may investigate an employee, contractor, or volunteer of a licensed entity and may substantiate that the individual engaged in conduct that would significantly affect the health, safety, or welfare of an individual who is receiving a service from the entity. If the conduct is substantiated against an employee, contractor, or volunteer, the department shall issue a notice of the finding to the person and include the person in the appropriate civil history database identified under AS

47.05.330

. Before a substantiated finding against an employee, contractor, or volunteer may be included in a civil history database and provided as part of a check under AS

47.05.325

, the department shall provide the applicant notice of the finding and an opportunity to appeal the finding. The department shall adopt regulations to implement this subsection. In this subsection, “volunteer” includes an individual placed in a facility for training, educational, or internship purposes.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 20 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (d).

Sec. 47.32.100.
Cooperation with investigation.

An entity shall cooperate with an investigation initiated by the department. An investigated entity shall

permit representatives of the department to inspect the entity; review records, including files of individuals who received services from the entity; interview staff; and interview individuals receiving services from the entity; and

upon request, provide the department with information and documentation regarding compliance with applicable statutes and regulations.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.110.
Right of access and inspection.

A designated agent or employee of the department shall have right of access to an entity

to determine whether an application for licensure or renewal is appropriate;

to conduct a complaint investigation;

to conduct a standard inspection;

to inspect documents, including personnel records, accounts, the building, or the premises;

to interview staff or residents; or

if the department has reasonable cause to believe that the entity is operating in violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted under this chapter.

If an entity denies access, the department may petition the court for an order permitting access, or the department may seek to revoke the entity’s license under AS

47.32.140

.

Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the entity, the court shall issue an order to an officer or employee of the department authorizing the officer or employee to enter for any of the purposes described in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For hospice agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 7.

For free-standing birth centers, see 7 AAC 12, art. 9.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.120.
Report.

Within 10 working days after completing an investigation or inspection under AS

47.32.090

—

47.32.110

, the department shall prepare a report of the results of the investigation or inspection and mail a copy of the report to the entity. The report shall include a description of

any violation, including a citation to each statute or regulation that has been violated; and

any enforcement action the department intends to take under AS

47.32.130

or

47.32.140

.

An entity that receives a copy of a report under this section may submit a written response to the report to the department. The department may require an entity to submit a response to a report received under this section.

Within 14 days after the entity receives a copy of the report under this section, upon request of the complainant, the department shall provide a copy of the report to the complainant.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

Sec. 47.32.130.
Enforcement action: immediate revocation or suspension.

If the department’s report of investigation or inspection under AS

47.32.120

concludes that the department has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of an applicable statute or regulation has occurred that presents an immediate danger to the health, safety, or welfare of an individual receiving services from the entity, the department, without an administrative hearing and without providing an opportunity to cure or correct the violation, may immediately revoke or suspend the entity’s license or, if the entity is not licensed under this chapter, may revoke the entity’s ability to become licensed under this chapter or to provide services as an entity exempted under this chapter. A suspension or revocation under this subsection takes effect immediately upon initial notice to the entity from the department, is in addition to any enforcement action under AS

47.32.140

, and continues until a final determination under (c) of this section or AS

47.32.150

.

Notice under this section shall be provided as follows:

the department shall provide initial notice to the entity at the time the department determines that an immediate suspension or revocation is required; initial notice may be oral, except that, if an entity representative is not present at the entity, the department shall post written notice on the front door of the entity; the initial notice must provide information regarding the entity’s appeal rights;

the department shall provide formal written notice to the entity within 14 working days after the immediate revocation or suspension decision; formal written notice must include

a copy of the department’s report under AS

47.32.120

, a statement of the entity’s right to submit a written response to the report, and any department requirement that the entity submit a written response to the report;

a description of any enforcement action the department intends to take under AS

47.32.140(d)

or (f); and

information regarding the entity’s appeal rights.

An entity to which a notice has been provided under this section may appeal the department’s decision to impose the enforcement action, including an enforcement action the department intends to take under AS

47.32.140(d)

or (f), by filing a written request for a hearing, on a form provided by the department, within 15 days after receipt of the notice. If a hearing is not timely requested under this subsection, the department’s notice constitutes a final administrative order for which the department may seek the court’s assistance in enforcing.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

Sec. 47.32.140.
Violations, compliance, and enforcement.

If the department’s report of investigation or inspection under AS

47.32.120

concludes that the department has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of an applicable statute or regulation has occurred, the department shall provide notice to the entity of the violation and an opportunity to cure the violation within a reasonable time specified by the department. The notice must include a copy of the department’s report under AS

47.32.120

, a statement that the entity may submit a written response to the report, any department requirement that the entity submit a written response to the report, a description of any enforcement action the department intends to take under (d) or (f) of this section, and information regarding the entity’s appeal rights.

An entity receiving a notice under (a) of this section, or a notice under AS

47.32.130(b)(2)

that contains the information specified in AS

47.32.130(b)(2)

(B), shall submit a plan of correction to the department for approval. Once it has cured its violations, the entity shall submit to the department an allegation of compliance. Upon receipt of the allegation of compliance, the department may conduct a follow-up investigation or inspection to determine compliance. The department may take one or more enforcement actions under (d) and (f) of this section regardless of whether the entity achieves compliance under this subsection.

If the department believes that an entity has not voluntarily corrected the violation or entered into a plan of correction with the approval of the department, the department may require that the entity participate in a plan of correction under regulations of the department. Once the entity has cured its violations, it shall submit to the department an allegation of compliance. Upon receipt of the allegation of compliance, the department may conduct a follow-up investigation or inspection to determine compliance. The department may take one or more enforcement actions under (d) and (f) of this section regardless of whether the entity achieves compliance under this subsection.

The department may take one or more of the following enforcement actions under this section:

delivery of a warning notice to the licensed entity and to any additional person who was the subject of the investigation or inspection;

modification of the term or scope of the entity’s existing license, including changing a biennial license to a provisional license or adding a condition to the license;

suspension of the entity’s operations for a period of time set by the department;

suspension of or a ban on the entity’s provision of services to individuals not already receiving services from the entity for a period of time set by the department;

nonrenewal of the entity’s license;

revocation of the entity’s license or, if the entity is not licensed under this chapter, revocation of the entity’s ability to become licensed under this chapter;

issuance of an order requiring closure, immediate or otherwise, of the entity regardless of whether the entity is licensed or unlicensed;

denial of payments under AS 47.07 for the entity’s provision of services to an individual not already receiving services from the entity;

assumption of either temporary or permanent management of the entity or pursuit of a court-ordered receiver for the entity;

reduction of the number of individuals receiving services from the entity under the license;

imposition of a penalty authorized under law;

inclusion in a civil history database identified under AS

47.05.330

.

The department may not take action under (d)(9) of this section unless the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that continued management by the entity while the entity is attempting to cure a violation would be injurious to the health, safety, or welfare of an individual who is receiving a service from the entity.

In addition to any other enforcement actions the department may take under this section, the department may assess a civil fine against an entity for a violation of an applicable statute or regulation, taking into account the type and size of the entity and the type and severity of the violation. A fine assessed under this subsection may not exceed $2,500 a day for each day of violation for a continuing violation or $25,000 for a single violation.

An entity to which a notice has been provided under this section regarding an enforcement action under (d) or (f) of this section may appeal the department’s decision to impose the enforcement action by filing a written request for a hearing, on a form provided by the department, within 15 days after receipt of the notice of the enforcement action.

An enforcement action under (d) or (f) of this section may not be imposed until

the time period for requesting a hearing under AS

47.32.130(c)

or under (g) of this section, as applicable, has passed without a hearing being requested; or

a final agency decision has been issued following a hearing requested under AS

47.32.130(c)

or under (g) of this section, as applicable.

If a hearing is not timely requested under AS

47.32.130(c)

or under (g) of this section, as applicable, the department’s notice regarding an enforcement action under (d) or (f) of this section constitutes a final administrative order. The department may seek the court’s assistance in enforcing the final administrative order.

An entity against which an enforcement action under (d) or (f) of this section has been taken may not apply for a license or license renewal until after the time period set by the department in its final administrative order under AS

47.32.130(c)

, this section, or AS

47.32.150

, as applicable. If a time period has not been set, a final administrative order against the entity has the effect of a permanent revocation, and the entity may not apply for a license or license renewal. If the ownership, control, or management of an entity changes, the department may allow the entity to seek licensure if the entity submits documents showing the change.

Assessment of a civil fine under this section does not preclude imposition of a criminal penalty under AS

47.32.170

.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 21 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in (d), substituted “a civil history database identified” for “the registry established” following “inclusion in” in (d)(12), deleted (d)(13), which read, “(13) requirement that the entity prepare and submit a plan of correction”.

Sec. 47.32.150.
Hearings.

Upon receipt of a timely request for a hearing by an entity regarding an enforcement action under AS

47.32.130(a)

or

47.32.140(d)(3)

, (5), (6), (7), or (9), the department shall request the chief administrative law judge appointed under AS

44.64.020

to appoint an administrative law judge employed or retained by the office of administrative hearings to preside over a hearing conducted under this section. AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

and AS

44.64.060

apply to the hearing.

Upon receipt of a timely request for a hearing by an entity regarding an enforcement action under AS

47.05.310

, AS

47.32.070

, or

47.32.140(d)(1)

, (2), (4), (8), (10), (11), or (12) or (f), the department shall conduct a hearing in front of an officer appointed by the commissioner. A hearing under this subsection may be conducted on the record, in an informal manner, and may not be conducted under AS 44.62 or AS 44.64. The appointed hearing officer may be a state employee.

The decision following a hearing conducted under (a) or (b) of this section constitutes a final agency administrative order.

A hearing conducted under this section shall take place within 120 days after the department’s receipt of the request for hearing. A hearing may be held on an expedited basis upon a showing of good cause. An expedited hearing shall be held within 60 days after the department’s receipt of the request for a hearing.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 22 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in the first sentence in (b), inserted “AS

47.05.310

,” at the beginning of the citation list, and, at the end of the list, substituted “(11), or (12) or (f)” for “(11), (12), or (13)”.

Sec. 47.32.160.
Immunity.

The department, its employees, and its agents are not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in the licensure process, the monitoring of a licensed entity, or any activities under this chapter.

A volunteer who works for a hospice program licensed under this chapter is not liable for damages for personal injury, wrongful death, or property damage for an act or omission committed in the course of hospice-related duties unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)